Maryland, session 2025, HB0304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(b) (1) “Architectural services” means professional or creative work that:
(i) is performed in connection with the design and supervision of
construction or landscaping; and
(ii) requires architectural education, training, and experience.
(2) “Architectural services” includes consultation, research, investigation,
evaluation, planning, architectural design and preparation of related documents, and
coordination of services that structural, civil, mechanical, and electrical engineers and
other consultants provide.

HOUSE BILL 304 3
(3) “Architectural services” does not include construction inspection
services, services provided in connection with an energy performance contract, or
structural, mechanical, plumbing, or electrical engineering.
(c) “Bid” means a response to an invitation for bids under § 13–103 of this article.
(d) “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
(e) “CHANGE ORDER” MEANS A WRITTEN ORDER THAT:
(1) IS SIGNED BY THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER; AND
(2) DIRECTS THE CONTRACTOR TO MAKE CHANGES THAT ARE
REQUIRED BY A CHANGE IN LAW OR THAT THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT
AUTHORIZES THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER TO ORDER WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF
THE CONTRACTOR.
(F) “Chief Procurement Officer” means an official of the Department of General
Services who:
(1) shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the
Senate;
(2) except for procurement activity by a primary procurement unit other
than the Department of General Services, is the head of all procurement activity for the
Executive Branch of State government; and
(3) may engage in or control procurement for the Department of General
Services in accordance with § 12–107(b)(2) of this article.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Construction” means the process of building, altering,
improving, or demolishing an improvement to real property.
(2) “Construction” includes any major work necessary to repair, prevent
damage to, or sustain existing components of an improvement to real property.
(3) “Construction” does not include the maintenance or routine operation
of an existing improvement to real property, or activities related to an energy performance
contract.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Construction related services” means feasibility studies,
surveys, construction management, construction inspection, and similar efforts associated
with construction or the acquisition of public improvements as defined in § 4–401(d) of this
article.

HOUSE BILL 304
(2) “Construction related services” does not include services provided in
connection with an energy performance contract.
(I) “CONTRACT MODIFICATION” MEANS A WRITTEN ALTERATION THAT:
(1) AFFECTS SPECIFICATIONS, DELIVERY POINT, DATE OF DELIVERY,
PERIOD OF PERFORMANCE, PRICE, QUANTITY, OR OTHER PROVISIONS OF A
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT, INCLUDING MODIFICATIONS REQUIRED DUE TO
CHANGES IN LAW OR REGULATION THAT INCREASE THE CONTRACTOR’S COST OF OR
TIME FOR PERFORMANCE OF THE CONTRACT; AND
(2) IS ACCOMPLISHED BY MUTUAL ACTION OF THE PARTIES TO THE
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
[(h)] (J) “County” means a county of the State and, unless expressly provided
otherwise, Baltimore City.
[(i)] (K) “Energy performance contract” means an agreement for the provision
of energy services, including electricity, heating, ventilation, cooling, steam, or hot water,
in which a person agrees to design, install, finance, maintain, or manage energy systems
or equipment to improve the energy efficiency of a building or facility in exchange for a
portion of the energy savings.
[(j)] (L) (1) “Engineering services” means professional or creative work that:
(i) is performed in connection with any utility, structure, building,
machine, equipment, or process, including structural, mechanical, plumbing, electrical,
geotechnical, and environmental engineering; and
(ii) requires engineering education, training, and experience in the
application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences.
(2) “Engineering services” includes consultation, investigation, evaluation,
planning, design, and inspection of construction to interpret and ensure compliance with
specifications and design within the scope of inspection services.
(3) “Engineering services” does not include services provided in connection
with an energy performance contract.
[(k)] (M) “Invitation for bids” means any document used for soliciting bids under
§ 13–103 of this article.
[(l)] (N) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, or representative of any kind and any partnership, firm,
association, corporation, or other entity.

HOUSE BILL 304 5
[(m)] (O) “Primary procurement units” means:
(1) the State Treasurer;
(2) the Department of General Services;
(3) the Department of Transportation;
(4) the University System of Maryland;
(5) the Maryland Port Commission;
(6) the Morgan State University; and
(7) the St. Mary’s College of Maryland.
[(n)] (P) (1) “Procurement” means the process of:
(i) leasing real or personal property as lessee; or
(ii) buying or otherwise obtaining supplies, services, construction,
construction related services, architectural services, engineering services, or services
provided under an energy performance contract.
(2) “Procurement” includes the solicitation and award of procurement
contracts and all phases of procurement contract administration.
[(o)] (Q) (1) “Procurement contract” means an agreement in any form entered
into by a unit for procurement.
(2) “Procurement contract” does not include:
(i) a collective bargaining agreement with an employee
organization;
(ii) an agreement with a contractual employee, as defined in §
1–101(d) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(iii) a Medicaid, Judicare, or similar reimbursement contract for
which law sets:
1. user or recipient eligibility; and
2. price payable by the State; or

HOUSE BILL 304
(iv) a Medicaid contract with a managed care organization, as
defined in § 15–101(e) of the Health – General Article as to which regulations adopted by
the Department establish:
1. recipient eligibility;
2. minimum qualifications for managed care organizations;
and
3. criteria for enrolling recipients in managed care
organizations.
[(p)] (R) “Procurement officer” means an individual authorized by a unit to:
(1) enter into a procurement contract;
(2) administer a procurement contract; or
(3) make determinations and findings with respect to a procurement
contract.
[(q)] (S) “Proposal” means a response to any solicitation other than an invitation
for bids.
[(r)] (T) “Request for proposals” means any document used for soliciting
proposals.
[(s)] (U) “Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who:
(1) has the capability in all respects to perform fully the requirements for
a procurement contract; and
(2) possesses the integrity and reliability that will ensure good faith
performance.
[(t)] (V) “Responsive bid” means a bid that:
(1) is submitted under § 13–103 of this article; and
(2) conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids.
[(u)] (W) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, “services”
means:
(i) the labor, time, or effort of a contractor; and

HOUSE BILL 304 7
(ii) any product or report necessarily associated with the rendering
of a service.
(2) “Services” includes services provided by attorneys, accountants,
physicians, consultants, and other professionals who are independent contractors.
(3) “Services” does not include:
(i) construction related services;
(ii) architectural services;
(iii) engineering services; or
(iv) energy performance contract services.
[(v)] (X) “State” means:
(1) a state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States; or
(2) the District of Columbia.
[(w)] (Y) (1) “State correctional facilities” means correctional institutions,
and all places of correctional confinement, that are located within the State of Maryland
and are primarily operated by the Maryland State government.
(2) “State correctional facilities” includes Patuxent Institution.
[(x)] (Z) (1) “Supplies” means:
(i) insurance;
(ii) tangible personal property;
(iii) printing; and
(iv) services necessarily associated with insurance or tangible
personal property.
(2) “Supplies” does not include:
(i) an interest in real property; or
(ii) tangible personal property acquired or used in connection with
an energy performance contract.

HOUSE BILL 304
[(y)] (AA) (1) “Unit” means an officer or other entity that is in the Executive
Branch of the State government and is authorized by law to enter into a procurement
contract.
(2) “Unit” does not include:
(i) a bistate, multistate, bicounty, or multicounty governmental
agency; or
(ii) a special tax district, sanitary district, drainage district, soil
conservation district, water supply district, or other political subdivision of the State.
13–104.
(H) (1) ON REQUEST OF AN UNSUCCESSFUL OFFEROR, THE
PROCUREMENT OFFICE OF A UNIT SHALL PROVIDE A DEBRIEFING OF A CONTRACT
AWARD.
(H) (1) AN UNSUCCESSFUL OFFEROR MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO THE
PROCUREMENT OFFICER FOR A DEBRIEFING OF THE RECOMMENDED CONTRACT
AWARD.
(2) AFTER RECEIVING A REQUEST FOR A DEBRIEFING UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL
PROVIDE THE DEBRIEFING:
(I) AS SOON AS IS FEASIBLE AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST;
AND
(II) BEFORE THE RECOMMENDED CONTRACT AWARD IS
PRESENTED FOR APPROVAL TO THE HEAD OF THE UNIT OR THE BOARD.
(2) (3) EXCEPT FOR INFORMATION SUBJECT TO A
CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT REASONABLY DETERMINED BY THE PROCUREMENT
OFFICER TO BE CONFIDENTIAL, PROPRIETARY, OR PRIVILEGED, A DEBRIEFING
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE ALL
RELEVANT INFORMATION THAT HAS BEEN REQUESTED.
(4) THE OFFICE OF STATE PROCUREMENT SHALL ESTABLISH
GUIDELINES FOR DEBRIEFINGS OBTAINED FROM A PROPOSAL BY, OR DISCUSSIONS
WITH, A COMPETING OFFEROR THAT IS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO DETERMINE:
(I) WHETHER ALL EVALUATION PROCEDURES REQUIRED BY
LAW HAVE BEEN PROPERLY INTERPRETED AND PERFORMED;

HOUSE BILL 304 9
(II) WHETHER THE PROCUREMENT ADVANCES THE PURPOSES
AND POLICIES ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–201 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) WHETHER THE CONDUCT OF UNIT PERSONNEL WAS BIASED,
IN BAD FAITH, OR WITHOUT SUBSTANTIAL JUSTIFICATION; OR
(IV) WHETHER THE UNIT FAILED TO PRODUCE ANY DOCUMENT
REQUIRED BY LAW OR REGULATION.
(3) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE REMEDIED BY ORDER OF THE MARYLAND STATE BOARD OF
CONTRACT APPEALS.
13–201.
[(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Change order” means a written order that:
(1) is signed by the procurement officer; and
(2) directs the contractor to make changes that the procurement contract
authorizes the procurement officer to order without the consent of the contractor.
(c) “Contract modification” means a written alteration that:
(1) affects specifications, delivery point, date of delivery, period of
performance, price, quantity, or other provisions of a procurement contract; and
(2) is accomplished by mutual action of the parties to the procurement
contract.
(d) “Cost–reimbursement] IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COST–REIMBURSEMENT
contract” means a procurement contract under which the State reimburses a contractor for
fees and other costs that are:
(1) recognized as allowable and allocable under the regulations of the
Board on price and cost principles; and
(2) within a stated ceiling.
13–212.1.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, assisting in the drafting of
specifications, an invitation for bids, or a request for proposals for a procurement does not
include:

HOUSE BILL 304
(1) providing descriptive literature, such as catalogue sheets, brochures,
technical data sheets, or standard specification “samples”, whether requested by an
executive unit or provided unsolicited;
(2) submitting written or oral comments on a specification prepared by an
executive unit or on a solicitation for a bid or proposal when comments are solicited from
two or more persons as part of a request for information or a prebid or preproposal process;
(3) providing specifications for a sole source procurement made in
accordance with § 13–107 of this title;
(4) providing architectural and engineering services for:
(i) programming, master planning, or other project planning
services; or
(ii) the design of a construction project if:
1. the design services do not involve lead or prime design
responsibilities or construction phase responsibilities on behalf of the State; and
2. A. the anticipated value of the procurement contract at
the time of advertisement is at least $2,500,000 and not more than $100,000,000; or
B. regardless of the amount of the procurement contract, the
payment to the individual or person for the design services does not exceed $500,000; [or]
(5) for a procurement of health, human, social, or educational services,
comments solicited from two or more persons as part of a request for information, including
written or oral comments on a draft specification, an invitation for bids, or a request for
proposals; OR
(6) RECEIVING PROVIDING INFORMATION FROM VENDORS THAT
DOES NOT PROVIDE AN UNFAIR COMPETITIVE ADVANTAGE FOR ANY BIDDER OR
OFFEROR.
13–218.
(a) Each procurement contract shall include clauses covering:
(1) termination for default;
(2) termination wholly or partly by the State for its convenience if the head
of the primary procurement unit determines that termination is appropriate;

HOUSE BILL 304 11
(3) variations that occur between estimated and actual quantities of work
in a procurement contract;
(4) liquidated damages, as appropriate;
(5) specified excuses for nonperformance;
(6) except for real property leases, the unilateral right of the State to order
in writing:
(i) changes in the work, if the changes are within the scope of the
procurement contract; and
(ii) a temporary stop or delay in performance;
(7) the obligation of the contractor to comply with the political contribution
reporting requirements under Title 14 of the Election Law Article, to which the contractor
may be subject as required under § 17–402 of this article; [and]
(8) nonvisual access for information technology as required under §
3A–312 of this article; AND
(9) A REQUIREMENT FOR A CHANGE ORDER CONTRACT
MODIFICATION TO PROVIDE AN EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT TO COMPENSATE THE
CONTRACTOR FOR INCREASES IN THE COST OF AND TIME FOR CONTRACT
PERFORMANCE DUE TO CHANGES IN LAW.
15–112.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a unit
may not require a prime contractor and a prime contractor may not require a subcontractor
to begin change order work under a contract until the procurement officer for the unit issues
a written change order that specifies whether the work is to proceed, in compliance WITH
ANY CHANGES IN LAW OR REGULATION OR with the terms of the contract, on:
(i) an agreed–to price which may include a preestablished catalog
or unit prices based on local prevailing wage rates and equipment and material costs for
each task required for the change order as included in the bid documents at the time of bid;
(ii) a force account;
(iii) a construction change directive; or
(iv) a time and materials basis.
15–218.

HOUSE BILL 304
(a) Except as provided under § 15–219 of this subtitle, a A procurement officer
who receives a TIMELY protest [or a contract claim from a contractor] shall comply with
this section.
(b) (1) On receipt of a TIMELY protest [or contract claim from a contractor], a
procurement officer:
(i) shall review the substance of the protest [or contract claim];
(ii) may request additional information or substantiation through an
appropriate procedure;
(iii) may discuss with interested parties and, if appropriate, may
conduct negotiations with the person initiating the protest [or contract claim]; and
(iv) shall comply with any applicable regulations.
(2) Unless clearly inappropriate, the procurement officer shall seek the
advice of the Office of the Attorney General ON ANY LEGAL ISSUES RAISED IN THE
PROTEST.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and consistent with the State
budget and other applicable laws, the procurement officer shall:
(i) resolve the protest [or contract claim] by agreement of the
parties];
(ii) wholly or partly deny the protest [or contract claim]; or
(iii) wholly or partly grant the relief sought by the person who
submitted the protest [or contract claim].
(2) The procurement officer promptly shall send the decision in writing to
the reviewing authority.
(d) Unless otherwise provided by regulation, the decision of the procurement
officer shall be reviewed promptly by:
(1) the head of the unit OR DESIGNEE; and
(2) the head of the principal department or other equivalent unit of which
the unit is a part OR DESIGNEE.
(e) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, the
reviewing authority shall approve, disapprove, or modify the decision of the procurement

HOUSE BILL 304 13
officer [within 180 days after receiving the contract claim] WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE PROTEST or a longer period to which the parties agree.
(2) The action of the reviewing authority under this subsection
PROCUREMENT OFFICER shall be the final action of the unit.
(3) The reviewing authority may remand the proceeding with instructions
to the procurement officer.
(4) On remand, the procurement officer shall proceed under subsection (b)
of this section in accordance with those instructions.
(f) (1) A decision [not to pay a contract claim] TO DENY A PROTEST is a final
action for the purpose of appeal to the Appeals Board.
(2) The failure to reach ISSUE a decision within the time required under
subsection (e) of this section ON THE PROTEST WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT may be
deemed, at the SOLE option of the [contractor, to be a decision not to pay the contract claim]
BIDDER OR OFFEROR PROTESTOR, TO BE A DECISION TO DENY THE PROTEST.
15–219.
(a) [Except to the extent a shorter period is prescribed by regulation governing
differing site conditions, a] A contractor shall file a written notice of a claim relating to a
procurement contract [for construction] within [30] 90 60 days after [the basis for the
claim is known or should have been known] THE EARLIER LATER OF:
(1) A UNIT DENYING A REQUEST FOR EQUITABLE ADJUSTMENT; OR
(2) THE PARTIES REACHING AN IMPASSE IN DISCUSSIONS
ATTEMPTING TO RESOLVE THEIR DISAGREEMENT REGARDING THE REQUEST.
(b) Unless extended by the unit, within 90 days after submitting a notice of a
contract claim under a procurement contract [for construction], a contractor shall submit
to the unit a written explanation that states:
(1) the amount of the contract claim;
(2) the facts on which the contract claim is based; and
(3) all relevant data and correspondence that may substantiate the
contract claim.
(c) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A TIMELY CONTRACT CLAIM FROM A
CONTRACTOR, A PROCUREMENT OFFICER:

HOUSE BILL 304
(I) SHALL REVIEW THE SUBSTANCE OF THE CONTRACT CLAIM;
(II) MAY REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OR
SUBSTANTIATION THROUGH AN APPROPRIATE PROCEDURE;
(III) MAY CONDUCT NEGOTIATIONS WITH THE CONTRACTOR
INITIATING THE CONTRACT CLAIM; AND
(IV) SHALL COMPLY WITH ANY APPLICABLE REGULATIONS.
(2) UNLESS CLEARLY INAPPROPRIATE, THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER
SHALL SEEK THE ADVICE OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON ANY
LEGAL ISSUES.
(D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AND CONSISTENT WITH
THE STATE BUDGET AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS, THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER
SHALL:
(1) RESOLVE THE CONTRACT CLAIM BY AGREEMENT OF THE PARTIES;
(2) WHOLLY OR PARTLY DENY THE CONTRACT CLAIM; OR
(3) WHOLLY OR PARTLY GRANT THE RELIEF SOUGHT BY THE
CLAIMANT.
(E) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the head of the unit OR
DESIGNEE engaged in procurement [of the construction] shall review the contract claim
AND THE DECISION OF THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER.
(2) If the unit is part of a principal department or other equivalent unit,
the Secretary of the principal department or the equivalent official OR DESIGNEE shall
review the contract claim AND THE DECISION OF THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER, unless
review has been delegated by regulation to the head of the unit.
(3) THE ACTION OF THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE THE FINAL ACTION OF THE UNIT.
[(d) The person who reviews a contract claim under subsection (c) of this section
shall:
(1) investigate the contract claim; and
(2) give the contractor written notice of a resolution of the contract claim:

HOUSE BILL 304 15
(i) within 90 days after receiving the contract claim or a longer
period to which the parties agree, if the amount of the contract claim is not more than the
amount under which the accelerated procedure may be selected before the Appeals Board;
or
(ii) for any other contract claim, within 180 days after receiving the
contract claim or a longer period to which the parties agree.
(e)] (F) Recovery under a contract claim is not allowed for any expense
incurred:
(1) more than [30] 60 days before the [required submission of a notice of a
claim] LAST DAY ON WHICH NOTICE OF A CLAIM IS PERMITTED TO BE FILED under
subsection (a) of this section; or
(2) unless the time for submission of a claim is extended under subsection
(b) of this section, more than [120] 150 days before the [required submission of the claim]
LAST DAY ON WHICH NOTICE OF A CLAIM IS PERMITTED TO BE FILED.
[(f)] (G) (1) If the unit determines that it is responsible for a portion but not
all of the amount claimed by the contractor, subject to the terms of the contract, the unit
shall pay the undisputed amount.
(2) Payment of the undisputed amount:
(i) is not an admission of the liability of the unit on the claims; and
(ii) does not preclude recovery of the amount paid if it subsequently
is determined that the determination of the unit was not correct.
[(g)] (H) [(1)] A decision not to pay a contract claim is a final action for the
purpose of appeal to the Appeals Board.
[(2) The failure to reach a decision within the time required under
subsection (c) of this section may be deemed, at the option of the contractor, to be a decision
not to pay the contract claim.]
(H) (I) (1) AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO RECEIVING PAYMENT ON A CLAIM,
ON WRITTEN REQUEST BY THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER, THE CONTRACTOR SHALL
PROVIDE THE UNIT WITH THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO ALL CONTRACT CLAIMS,
INCLUDING CLAIMS THAT ARE PENDING ADMINISTRATIVELY IN COURT ON JULY 1,
2025.
(2) PRIOR TO AUTHORIZING PAYMENT ON A CLAIM, THE
PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL REQUIRE THE CONTRACTOR TO SUPPLEMENT THE
CLAIM WITH A CERTIFICATION BY A SENIOR OFFICER OR GENERAL PARTNER OF THE

HOUSE BILL 304
CONTRACTOR OR THE SUBCONTRACTOR, AS APPLICABLE, THAT, TO THE BEST OF
THAT PERSON’S KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF:
(1) (I) THE CLAIM IS MADE IN GOOD FAITH;
(2) (II) ALL SUPPORTING DATA IS ACCURATE AND COMPLETE; AND
(3) (III) THE AMOUNT REQUESTED ACCURATELY REFLECTS THE
CONTRACT CLAIM FOR WHICH THE PERSON BELIEVES THE PROCUREMENT AGENCY
IS LIABLE.
[(h)] (I) (J) At the time of final payment, the unit shall:
(1) release the retainage due to the contractor; and
(2) pay any interest that:
(i) has accrued on the retainage from the time of payment of the
semifinal estimate; and
(ii) is due and payable to the contractor.
15–221.2.
(a) This section applies to a claim resulting under a contract.
(b) The Appeals Board may award to a contractor the reasonable costs of filing
and pursuing a claim OR DEFENDING AGAINST A CLAIM UNDER § 15–219.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, including reasonable attorney’s fees, if the Appeals Board finds that the conduct
of the unit in processing a contract claim is in bad faith, without substantial justification,
or in violation of law.
(c) The Appeals Board shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
15–223.
(a) (1) A decision of the Appeals Board is subject to judicial review in
accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(2) Any party to an Appeals Board decision, including a unit, may appeal a
final decision of the Appeals Board to [a court of competent jurisdiction] THE APPELLATE
COURT OF MARYLAND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.